xx: Råd & Rön: Bra köp, Rad & Ron Bra kop
sv: Råd & Rön: Bra köp

xx: Råd & Rön: Bäst i test Nov 2020, Rad & Ron Bast i test Nov 2020
sv: Råd & Rön: Bäst i test Nov 2020

en: HACCP, Hazard analysis and critical control points
xx: HACCP
ar: HACCP, تحليل المخاطر ونقاط التحكم الحرجة
ca: HACCP, Anàlisi de Perills i Punts de Control Crítics
de: HACCP, Hazard Analysis and Critical Control Points, Gefahrenanalyse und kritische Kontrollpunkte, Gefahrenanalyse und kritische Lenkungspunkte
es: HACCP, Análisis de Peligros y Puntos de Control Críticos
fa: HACCP, تحلیل زیان و کنترل نقاط بحرانی
fi: HACCP, vaarojen arviointi ja kriittiset hallintapisteet
fr: HACCP, Système d'analyse des dangers et points critiques pour leur maîtrise, Système HACCP
gl: HACCP, Análise de perigos e puntos de control crítico
hr: HACCP, Hazard Analysis and Critical Control Point
hu: HACCP, HACCP-rendszer
id: HACCP, Analisis bahaya dan pengendalian titik kritis
it: HACCP, Analisi dei rischi e controllo dei punti critici
pl: HACCP, Analiza zagrożeń i krytyczne punkty kontroli
pt: HACCP, Análise de Perigos e Pontos Críticos de Controle
ru: HACCP, анализ рисков и критических контрольных точек
sr: HACCP, Анализа ризика и критичне контролне тачке
th: HACCP, การวิเคราะห์อันตรายและการควบคุมจุดวิกฤต
uk: HACCP, аналіз ризиків і критичних контрольних точок
zh: HACCP, 危害分析重要管制點

en: ISO 3632
xx: ISO 3632

en: ISO 9000
xx: ISO 9000

en: ISO 9000-2005
xx: ISO 9000-2005

en: ISO 9001
xx: ISO 9001
es: ISO 9001, ISO 9001, Certificación de calidad ISO 9001
fi: ISO 9001, ISO 9001 laatujärjestelmäsertifikaatti
fr: ISO 9001, Certifie iso 9001, La certification qualite iso 9001
hu: ISO 9001, ISO 9001 tanúsítvány
it: ISO 9001, Uni en iso 9001, Sistema di qualita certificato iso 9001
pt: ISO 9001, Sistema de Gestão da Qualidade ISO 9001
ru: ISO 9001, ИСО 9001

en: ISO 9001-2000
xx: ISO 9001-2000
ru: ИСО 9001-2000, ГОСТ Р ИСО 9001

en: ISO-9001-2008, ISO 9001 2008 certified qms
xx: ISO 9001-2008

ru: ГОСТ Р ИСО 9001-2008, ГОСТ ISO 9001-2011
xx: ISO 9001-2011

en: ISO 9001-2015
xx: ISO 9001-2015
ru: ГОСТ Р ИСО 9001-2015

en: ISO 9002
xx: ISO 9002

en: ISO 13485
xx: ISO 13485

en: ISO 14001
xx: ISO 14001

en: ISO 14001-2008
xx: ISO 14001-2008

en: ISO 14001-2015
xx: ISO 14001-2015

en: ISO 14067
xx: ISO 14067

en: ISO 14067:2018
xx: ISO 14067:2018

en: ISO 22000
xx: ISO 22000
fr: ISO 22000, ISO22000
ru: ИСО 22000, ISO 22000

en: ISO 22000:2005
xx: ISO 22000:2005